Tennessee, session 114, HB2164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-82-701(b)(4), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (A) and adding the following as subdivision (B):
(B) A utility system owned and operated by a nonprofit association that:
(i) Was created in 1985;
(ii) Is responsible for the governance and maintenance of a community
that has at least five thousand (5,000) lots or units;
(iii) Provides direct funding for some emergency services for the safety
and protection of members of the association;
(iv) Provides water and wastewater services for the exclusive use of the
members of the association; and
(v) Whose governing board adopted a resolution requesting the
Tennessee board of utility regulation have jurisdiction over the association.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2164
012169
- 1 -